Hawaii statutes.
[§465D-1] Findings and declaration of
necessity. It is the intent of the legislature to establish standards for
the licensing of behavior analysts to address the present and critical need for
ensuring that those in the community requiring diagnosis and treatment for
autism receive the care needed along with other healthcare needs. The special
state interest for creating this chapter is recognized, notwithstanding the
requirements of section 26H-6. [L 2015, c 199, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next